Hawaii statutes.
[§174C-55] Duration of permits. Each
permit for water use in a designated water management area shall be valid until
the designation of the water management area is rescinded, unless revoked as
provided in section 174C-58 or modified as provided in section 174C-57. [L
1987, c 45, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next